Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SNOW-SCULPTING CHAMPIONSHIP.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Greater Stillwater Chamber of Commerce Foundation to host a world snow-sculpting championship. new text end